Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1719
Funds received; deposits authorized.

All money received by the authority from whatever source, including sale of its bonds, shall be deemed to be public trust funds to be held and applied in the manner provided in the Parking Authority Law and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or bond agreement executed by the authority. Such money shall be deposited in such banks, capital stock financial institutions, qualifying mutual financial institutions, or trust companies as may be selected by the authority from time to time. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 19, p. 112;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 303.